District of Columbia statutes.
31-4404

Formation — Authority to solicit stock subscriptions or insurance applications.

No person shall solicit subscriptions for the capital stock of or applications for insurance in any such company in course of organization unless he has been duly authorized by the company and a certificate of his authority, duly signed by a principal officer of the company, has been filed with and approved by the Commissioner.

History

June 19, 1934, 48 Stat. 1145, ch. 672, ch. III, § 4
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(k), 44 DCR 1730

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-604.
1973 Ed., § 35-504.

Editor's Notes

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-4402.